Utah statutes.
53-2a-803.   Emergency interim successor to office of governor.

(1)  If the governor is unavailable, and if the lieutenant governor, president of the Senate, and the speaker of the House of Representatives are unavailable to exercise the powers and duties of the office of governor, the attorney general, state auditor, or state treasurer shall, in the order named, exercise the powers and duties of the office of governor until:

(a)  the governor, lieutenant governor, president of the Senate, or speaker of the House of Representatives becomes available; or

(b)  a new governor is elected and qualified.

(2)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection (1), no emergency interim successor to the lieutenant governor, president of the Senate, speaker of the House of Representatives, attorney general, state auditor, or state treasurer may serve as governor.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

